Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.82.055

Trafficking in stolen property in the second degree.

(1) A person who recklessly traffics in stolen property is guilty of trafficking in stolen property in the second degree.

(2) Trafficking in stolen property in the second degree is a class C felony.

[ 2003 c 53 s 87.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.